Wyoming, session 2025, SF0071.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-2-106(d) is amended to read:

6-2-106. Homicide by vehicle; aggravated homicide by
vehicle; penalties.

(d) Any person convicted of aggravated homicide by
vehicle for causing the death of another person while
SF0071

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0261
operating or driving a vehicle in violation of W.S.
31-5-233 shall not be issued an ignition interlock
restricted license under W.S. 31-5-233 or 31-7-401 through
31-7-404 unless the person has first completed the period
of revocation provided under W.S. 31-7-127(b) for each
conviction under this section.

Section 2. This act shall apply to persons convicted
of aggravated homicide by vehicle for causing the death of
another person while operating or driving a vehicle in
violation of W.S. 31-5-233 before, on and after July 1,
2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0071